Oklahoma, session 2025, SB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2906, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2906. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older


or any totally disabled person, who is the head of a household, a


resident of and domiciled in this state during the entire preceding


calendar year, and whose gross household income for such year does


not exceed Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) Thirty-eight


Thousand Dollars ($38,000.00) may file a claim for property tax


relief on the amount of property taxes paid on the household


occupied by such person during the preceding calendar year. Each


head of household shall be allowed to file only one claim per year.



Req. No. 731 Page 1


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2907, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2907. A. The amount of any claim filed pursuant to


Section 108 of this act 2908 of this title shall be for the amount


of the property taxes paid by the claimant for the preceding


calendar year which exceeds one percent (1%) of the household


income, but no claim for property tax relief shall exceed Two


Hundred Dollars ($200.00) Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00).


B. The right to file a claim and to receive property tax relief


under the provisions of this act Sections 2904 through 2911 of this


title shall be personal to the claimant and shall not survive his or


her death, except that a surviving spouse of the claimant may


receive benefits hereunder upon the timely filing of a claim.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-731 QD 1/19/2025 5:36:37 AM

















Req. No. 731 Page 2